Hawaii statutes.
[§291C-149] Bicycle racing. (a)
Bicycle racing on the highways is prohibited except as authorized in this
section.

(b) Bicycle racing on a highway shall not be
unlawful when a racing event has been approved by local authorities for any
highway under their respective jurisdictions or for state highways, by the
director of transportation. The director may adopt rules pursuant to chapter
91 necessary for the purposes of this chapter. Approval of bicycle highway
racing events shall be granted only under conditions which assure reasonable
safety for all race participants, spectators and other highway users, and which
prevent unreasonable interference with traffic flow which would seriously
inconvenience other highway users.

(c) By agreement with the local authority,
participants in an approved bicycle highway racing event may be exempted from
compliance with any traffic laws otherwise applicable thereto, provided that
traffic control is adequate to assure the safety of all highway users. [L 1984,
c 273, §16]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next